North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-38 Income Tax
57-38-30.6.
Corporate income tax credit for biodiesel or green diesel production or soybean and canola crushing facility equipment costs.

A taxpayer is entitled to a credit against tax liability determined under section 57-38-30 in the amount of ten percent per year for five years of the taxpayer’s direct costs incurred after December 31, 2002, to adapt or add equipment to retrofit an existing facility or construction of a new facility in this state for the purpose of producing or blending diesel fuel containing at least two percent biodiesel fuel or green diesel fuel by volume or of the taxpayer’s direct costs incurred after December 31, 2008, to adapt or add equipment to retrofit an existing facility or construction of a new facility in this state for the purpose of producing crushed soybeans or canola. For purposes of this section, “biodiesel” and “green diesel” mean fuel as defined in section 57-43.2-01. The credit under this section may not exceed the taxpayer’s liability as determined under this chapter for the taxable year and each year’s credit amount may be carried forward for up to five taxable years. A taxpayer is limited to two hundred fifty thousand dollars in the cumulative amount of credits under this section for all taxable years. A taxpayer may not claim a credit under this section for any taxable year before the taxable year in which the facility begins production or blending of diesel fuel containing at least two percent biodiesel fuel or green diesel fuel by volume or begins crushing soybeans or canola, but eligible costs incurred before the taxable year production, blending, or crushing begins may be claimed for purposes of the credit under this section for taxable years on or after the taxable year production, blending, or crushing begins.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 531, § 2; 2009, ch. 553, § 1; 2011, ch. 460, § 11.

57-38-31.
Duty of individuals and fiduciaries to make return.

Every resident individual, every fiduciary for a resident individual, estate, or trust, who is required by the provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, to file a federal income tax return, and every individual or fiduciary who receives income derived from sources in this state, shall file an income tax return with the state tax commissioner in such form as the commissioner may prescribe. Any person who is required to file a state income tax return but not required to compute a federal taxable income figure for federal income tax purposes is required to compute such a federal taxable income figure using a pro forma return pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, in order to determine a starting point for the computation of state income tax. Any person required to file an income tax return pursuant to the provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, with respect to income that is exempt from taxation under this chapter either because it cannot be constitutionally taxed or because it is exempt by any provision of law shall file a return prescribed by the tax commissioner in such form as will permit computation of the tax liability under this chapter on only that part of the income which is subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; provided, that such person elects to use that form of return rather than any other form of return that may be prescribed. The return must be signed by the person required to make it and must contain a written declaration that it is made and subscribed under penalties of perjury.

The same filing status and deduction method used by a husband and wife when filing federal income tax returns must be used when filing state income tax returns.

If the taxpayer is unable to make the taxpayer’s own return, the return must be made by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged with the care of the person or property of the taxpayer.

Every fiduciary subject to taxation under the provisions of this chapter shall make a return for the individual, estate, or trust for which the fiduciary acts; the return must be signed by the person required to make it and must contain a written declaration that it is made and subscribed under penalties of perjury.

The return made by a fiduciary must state such facts as the tax commissioner may prescribe.

A fiduciary required to make a return under this chapter is subject to all of the provisions of the chapter which apply to an individual.

If required by the tax commissioner, the return must be accompanied by a true copy of the federal income tax return of the taxpayer or by equivalent information in the form and manner prescribed by the tax commissioner. A true copy of the federal income tax return of the taxpayer or equivalent information must be furnished to the tax commissioner by the taxpayer or fiduciary at any time after filing of the return required by this chapter if so required by the tax commissioner.

The tax commissioner may prescribe alternative methods for signing, subscribing, or verifying a return filed by electronic means, including telecommunications, that shall have the same validity and consequence as the actual signature and written declaration for a paper return.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 22; 1925 Supp., § 2346a21; S.L. 1931, ch. 283, § 5; 1933, ch. 253, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 57-3831; S.L. 1947, ch. 339, § 1; 1953, ch. 329, §§ 1, 2; 1953, ch. 330, §§ 1 to 3; 1957 Supp., § 57-3831; S.L. 1959, ch. 393, § 8; 1961, ch. 359, § 4; 1967, ch. 453, § 1; 1983, ch. 624, § 3; 1985, ch. 632, § 2; 1989, ch. 710, § 3; 1997, ch. 54, § 2; 2005, ch. 561, § 2.

57-38-31.1.
Composite returns.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Member” means an individual or passthrough entity that is a shareholder of an S corporation; a partner in a general partnership, a limited partnership, or a limited liability partnership; or a member of a limited liability company, settlor of a grantor trust, or a beneficiary of a trust.

“Nonresident” means an individual who is not a resident of or domiciled in the state, a trust not organized in the state, or a passthrough entity that does not have its commercial domicile in the state.

“Passthrough entity” means a corporation that for the applicable tax year is treated as an S corporation under the Internal Revenue Code, a limited liability company that for the applicable tax year is not taxed as a corporation for federal income tax purposes, or a general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, trust, grantor trust, or similar entity recognized by the laws of this state that is not taxed for federal income tax purposes at the entity level.

A passthrough entity may file a composite income tax return on behalf of electing nonresident members reporting and paying income tax, at the highest marginal rate provided in section 57-38-30.3, on the members’ pro rata or distributive shares of income of the passthrough entity from doing business in, or deriving income from sources within, this state.

A nonresident member whose only source of income within the state is from one or more passthrough entities may elect to be included in a composite return filed under this section.

A nonresident member that has been included in a composite return may file an individual income tax return and shall receive credit for tax paid on the member’s behalf by the passthrough entity.

A passthrough entity shall withhold income tax, at the highest tax rate provided in section 57-38-30.3, on the share of income of the entity distributed to each nonresident member and pay the withheld amount in the manner prescribed by the tax commissioner. The passthrough entity is liable to the state for the payment of the tax required to be withheld under this section and is not liable to any member for the amount withheld and paid in compliance with this section. A member of a passthrough entity that is itself a passthrough entity (a lower-tier passthrough entity) is subject to this same requirement to withhold and pay income tax on the share of income distributed by the lower-tier passthrough entity to each of its nonresident members. The tax commissioner shall apply tax withheld and paid by a passthrough entity on distributions to a lower-tier passthrough entity to the withholding required of that lower-tier passthrough entity.

At the time of a payment made under this section, a passthrough entity shall deliver to the tax commissioner a return on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner showing the total amounts paid or credited to its nonresident members, the amount withheld in accordance with this section, and any other information the tax commissioner may require. A passthrough entity shall furnish to its nonresident member annually, but not later than the fifteenth day of the third month after the end of its taxable year, a record of the amount of tax withheld on behalf of the member on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner.

Notwithstanding subdivision a, a passthrough entity is not required to withhold tax for a nonresident member if:

The member has a pro rata or distributive share of income of the passthrough entity from doing business in, or deriving income from sources within, this state of less than one thousand dollars per annual accounting period;

The tax commissioner has determined by rule, ruling, or instruction that the member’s income is not subject to withholding;

The member elects to have the tax due paid as part of a composite return filed by the passthrough entity under subsection 2;

The entity is a publicly traded partnership as defined by section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code which is treated as a partnership for the purposes of the Internal Revenue Code and which has agreed to file an annual information return reporting the name, address, taxpayer identification number, and other information requested by the tax commissioner of each unitholder with an income in the state in excess of five hundred dollars; or

The member is a lower-tier passthrough entity that elects to be exempted from the withholding requirement under this subsection. The election must be made on a form and in a manner prescribed by the tax commissioner. The form must include a statement that the member certifies that the member will file any return and pay any tax required by this chapter on its distributive share of income from the source passthrough entity and that the member is subject to this state’s jurisdiction for the collection of that tax and any applicable penalty and interest. The tax commissioner may revoke the exemption under this paragraph if the source passthrough entity or member fails to comply with the requirements of this paragraph. If the exemption is revoked, the source passthrough entity shall begin withholding from the member within sixty days of receiving notification of the revocation from the tax commissioner. The tax commissioner may prescribe any procedures and guidelines necessary to administer this paragraph.

A passthrough entity failing to file a return, or failing to withhold or remit the tax withheld, as required by this section, is subject to the provisions of section 57-38-45.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 562, § 1; 2001, ch. 526, § 2; 2005, ch. 563, § 1; 2007, ch. 512, § 2; 2013, ch. 453, § 1.

Collateral References.

State income tax treatment of S corporations and their shareholders, 118 A.L.R.5th 597.

57-38-32.
Duty of corporations to make returns.

Each corporation that receives income from the sources designated in section 57-38-14, whether or not required to file an income tax return pursuant to the provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, shall, unless exempted by the provisions of section 57-38-09, make a return in such form as the tax commissioner may prescribe, stating specifically such facts as the tax commissioner may require for the purpose of making any computation required by this chapter. Any corporation which is required to file a state income tax return but not required to compute a federal taxable income figure for federal income tax purposes is required to compute such a federal taxable income figure using a pro forma return pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, in order to determine a starting point for the computation of state income tax. Any foreign loan and investment company engaged in business in this state, and whose income in this state consists solely of income exempt from taxation under this chapter, need not file an annual report unless specially requested to do so by the tax commissioner, but may file in lieu thereof an affidavit claiming exemption under this chapter. The return must be signed by the president, vice president, treasurer, assistant treasurer, chief accounting officer, or any other officer duly authorized so to act and it and any other declaration, statement, or document required to be made must contain or be verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. The tax commissioner may prescribe alternative methods for signing, subscribing, or verifying a return filed by electronic means, including telecommunications, that shall have the same validity and consequence as the actual signature and written declaration for a paper return.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 32; 1925 Supp., § 2346a31; R.C. 1943, § 57-3832; S.L. 1967, ch. 453, § 2; 1983, ch. 624, § 4; 1997, ch. 54, § 3; 2009, ch. 541, § 3.

Cross-References.

Farming or ranching income, check of corporations reporting for compliance with farm corporation requirements, see N.D.C.C. § 10-06.1-22.

57-38-33.
Failure to complete return or supply information.

If the tax commissioner is of the opinion that any person has failed to include in a return as filed, or to provide during the course of an audit, either intentionally or through error or for any other reason, information necessary to properly determine North Dakota taxable income, the tax commissioner may require from that person an amended return or any supplementary information as is necessary to properly and accurately determine a person’s North Dakota taxable income, in the form as the tax commissioner shall prescribe. If the person fails or refuses to file the amended return or to furnish the supplementary information requested, the tax commissioner may, after thirty days’ notice, determine the North Dakota taxable income of the person from the best information available and assess any tax due, including interest and penalty. If the tax commissioner finds that the taxpayer’s failure to provide an amended return or supplementary information was unreasonable and willful, the assessment of tax is final as to the tax commissioner. A North Dakota district court may reverse the tax commissioner’s assessment only if it finds that the taxpayer’s failure was not willful or that the tax commissioner’s request was unreasonable.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, §§ 25, 34; 1925 Supp., §§ 2346a24, 2346a33; R.C. 1943, § 57-3833; S.L. 1983, ch. 634, § 1; 1991, ch. 648, § 4.

57-38-34.
Time and place of filing returns — Interest on tax when time for filing is extended.

Returns must be in such form as the tax commissioner from time to time may prescribe and may include the requirement that a copy of the taxpayer’s federal income tax return or a portion thereof or information reflected thereon be attached to, furnished with, or included in the taxpayer’s state income tax return. The taxpayer’s state income tax return must contain a method for the taxpayer to identify the school district in which the taxpayer resides and must be filed with the tax commissioner’s office in Bismarck, North Dakota. The tax commissioner shall prepare blank forms for use in making returns and shall cause them to be distributed throughout this state, but failure to receive or secure a form does not relieve a taxpayer from making a return.

Returns made on the basis of the calendar year must be filed on or before the fifteenth day of April following the close of the calendar year and returns made on the basis of a fiscal year must be filed on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the close of the fiscal year. A return filed for a period of less than one year must be filed on or before April fifteenth, or on or before the date prescribed by the United States internal revenue service, whichever is later.

Returns for cooperatives, domestic international sales corporations, and foreign sales corporations, however, made on the basis of the calendar year must be filed on or before the fifteenth day of September following the close of the calendar year and returns made on the basis of a fiscal year must be filed on or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month following the close of the fiscal year.

Returns for exempt organizations required to report unrelated business taxable income under subsection 2 of section 57-38-09 made on the basis of the calendar year must be filed on or before the fifteenth day of May following the close of the calendar year and returns made on the basis of a fiscal year must be filed on or before the fifteenth day of the fifth month following the close of the fiscal year.

A taxpayer actively serving in the armed forces or merchant marine, outside the boundaries of the United States, may defer the filing of an income tax return and the payment of the income tax until such time as the federal income tax return is required to be filed at which time the state income tax return, with payment of tax, will also be due. No interest or penalty accrues to the date of such filing.

The tax commissioner may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing a return when, in the judgment of the tax commissioner, good cause exists.

For a person that was subject to the tax under chapter 57-35.3 for the calendar year ending December 31, 2012, payment of the tax under this chapter is due six months after the due date of the return as required under this section. The provisions of subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 57-38-45 do not apply to the tax due under this subsection. This subsection applies to the first tax year beginning after December 31, 2012.

A person that previously reported under chapter 57-35.3 on a calendar year basis and files its federal income tax return on a fiscal year basis must file a short period return for the period beginning January 1, 2013, and ending on the last day of the tax year in calendar year 2013.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, §§ 24, 33; 1925 Supp., §§ 2346a23, 2346a32; S.L. 1937, ch. 241, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 57-3834; S.L. 1953, ch. 331, § 1; 1957, ch. 366, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-3834; S.L. 1971, ch. 559, § 2; 1973, ch. 472, § 1; 1975, ch. 527, § 7; 1975, ch. 540, § 1; 1977, ch. 507, § 4; 1981, ch. 583, § 2; 1983, ch. 635, § 1; 1985, ch. 630, § 5; 1991, ch. 674, § 1; 2001, ch. 529, § 1; 2007, ch. 512, § 3; 2013, ch. 449, § 13.

Cross-References.

Federal tax information, confidentiality, penalty, use, see N.D.C.C. §§ 57-01-14, 57-01-15.

57-38-34.1.
Optional card income tax return. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 526, § 3.

57-38-34.2.
Filing of separate income tax returns by a husband and wife after joint income tax returns have been filed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 710, § 4.

57-38-34.3.
Optional contributions to nongame wildlife fund.

An individual taxpayer may designate on the tax return of that individual a contribution to the nongame wildlife fund of any amount of one dollar or more to be added to tax liability or deducted from any refund that would otherwise be payable by or to the individual. On the individual state income tax return the tax commissioner shall notify the individual of this optional contribution. The amount of these optional contributions must be transferred by the tax commissioner to the state treasurer for deposit in the nongame wildlife fund for use as provided in section 20.1-02-16.2.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 272, § 2; 1991, ch. 672, § 3.

57-38-34.4.
Requirement to report federal changes.

If a person’s federal taxable income or federal income tax liability for any taxable year is changed or corrected by the United States internal revenue service, or other competent authority, the person shall report the changes or corrections within ninety days after the date of the final determination of them by filing an amended state income tax return or other information as required by the tax commissioner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1, if a person files an amended federal income tax return for any taxable year, the person shall file an amended state income tax return and a copy of the amended federal income tax return within ninety days after the amended federal income tax return is filed.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 648, § 3.

57-38-34.5.
Optional contributions to centennial tree program trust fund. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 1991, ch. 573, § 2.

57-38-34.6.
Optional contributions to trees for North Dakota program trust fund.

An individual may designate on the tax return of that individual a contribution to the trees for North Dakota program trust fund of any amount of one dollar or more to be added to tax liability or deducted from any refund that would otherwise be payable by or to the individual. The tax commissioner shall notify taxpayers of this optional contribution on the individual state income tax returns. The tax commissioner shall transfer the amount of optional contributions under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the trees for North Dakota program trust fund for use as provided in chapter 4.1-21.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 68, § 4; 2017, ch. 65, § 6, effective July 1, 2017.

57-38-34.7.
Optional contributions to veterans’ postwar trust fund.

An individual may designate on the tax return of that individual a contribution to the veterans’ postwar trust fund of any amount of one dollar or more to be added to tax liability or deducted from any refund that otherwise would be payable by or to the individual. The tax commissioner shall notify taxpayers of this optional contribution on the individual state income tax returns. The tax commissioner shall transfer the amount of optional contributions under this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the veterans’ postwar trust fund.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 492 § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

57-38-35.
Payment of tax.

Every taxpayer shall compute the amount of tax due under the return and shall attach thereto a check, draft, or money order, payable to the state tax commissioner, Bismarck, North Dakota, for the amount of the tax computed.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, §§ 24, 35; 1925 Supp., §§ 2346a23, 2346a34; S.L. 1929, ch. 240, § 1; 1931, ch. 284, § 1; 1937, ch. 241, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 57-3835; S.L. 1955, ch. 324, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 57-3835; S.L. 1969, ch. 514, § 1; 1985, ch. 82, § 147.

57-38-35.1.
Minimum refunds and collections — Application of refunds.

No refunds may be made by the tax commissioner to any taxpayer unless the amount to be refunded, including interest, is at least five dollars. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57-38-55, the tax commissioner shall transfer any amount that is not refunded to a taxpayer under this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit in the organ transplant support fund.

No remittance of tax need be made nor any assessment or collection of tax should be made unless the amount is at least five dollars, including penalties and interest.

All refunds and credits for overpayment to any taxpayer, including excess income tax withheld or overpayment of estimated tax, may be applied to payment of taxpayer’s unpaid tax, interest, or penalty or delayed until taxpayer’s delinquent returns have been filed.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 418, §§ 1 to 3; 1979, ch. 611, § 1; 1981, ch. 583, § 3; 1983, ch. 636, § 1; 1985, ch. 630, § 6; 1987, ch. 694, § 2; 1991, ch. 260, § 2.

Decisions Under Prior Law

Interest.

This section provides for payment of interest on tax refunds resulting from losses incurred during or after 1979 irrespective of whether or not losses are carried back to years prior to 1979.

Republic Airlines v. State, 359 N.W.2d 843, 1984 N.D. LEXIS 436 (N.D. 1984) (decided before 1983 amendment of this section).

57-38-35.2.
Interest payments.

Interest at the rate of one percent per month or fraction of a month must be allowed and paid upon overpayments of tax as follows:

Interest on refunds arising from excess income tax withholding or overpayment of estimated tax accrues for payment forty-five days after the due date of the return or after the date the return was filed, whichever comes later.

Interest on refunds arising from amended returns or claims made for credit or refund accrues for payment from the due date of the return to the date of payment of the refund excepting the month in which the return was required to be filed.

Interest on refunds arising from net operating loss carrybacks, capital loss carrybacks, or tax credit carrybacks accrues for payment from the due date of the return for the year, determined without regard to extensions of the time for filing, giving rise to the loss carryback, to the date of payment of the refund, except that no interest accrues if the refund payment is made within forty-five days of the date the amended return or claim is filed to claim the refund attributable to the carryback.

No interest may be paid on refunds arising from amended returns or other claims filed for taxable years beginning before January 1, 1979.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 699, § 1; 1989, ch. 712, § 1; 1997, ch. 493, § 1; 1999, ch. 513, § 1; 2009, ch. 541, § 4.

57-38-36.
When payment of tax may be made in quarterly installments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 637, § 1.

57-38-37.
Receipt.

The tax commissioner, as soon as possible after the receipt of the return and remittance, if paid by cash or currency, shall issue a receipt to the taxpayer for the amount of the taxpayer’s remittance. Such receipt is not a receipt in full for the amount of the tax due, but only for the remittance made by the taxpayer.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 35; 1925 Supp., § 2346a34; S.L. 1929, ch. 240, § 1; 1931, ch. 284, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-3837; S.L. 1961, ch. 361, § 1.

57-38-38.
Tax commissioner to audit returns and assess tax.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the tax commissioner shall proceed to audit the returns of taxpayers and, not later than three years after the due date of the return, or three years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later, assess the tax and, if any additional tax is found due, shall notify the taxpayer in detail as to the reason for the increase.

For taxable years beginning before January 1, 1991, as to any corporation or other person whose principal place for managing or directing a business is outside North Dakota, the tax commissioner has six years after the due date of the return or six years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later, to audit the return of the corporation or other person and assess any additional tax found due. Effective for the taxable years beginning after December 31, 1990, and before January 1, 1993, the tax commissioner has five years to audit the return of the corporation or other person and assess any additional tax found due. Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1992, and before January 1, 1995, the time period for assessment under this subsection is four years. Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1994, the time period for assessment under this subsection is three years.

If there is a change in taxable income or income tax liability by an amount which is in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of taxable income or income tax liability stated in the return as filed, any additional tax determined to be due may be assessed at any time within six years after the due date of the return, or six years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later.

If a person has failed to file a return of income as required by this chapter, the tax may be assessed under section 57-38-33 or subsection 6 of section 57-38-45, or an action brought under section 57-38-47, at any time within ten years after the due date of the return.

If false or fraudulent information is given in the return, or if the failure to file a return is due to the fraudulent intent or the willful attempt of the taxpayer in any manner to evade the tax, the time limitations in this section do not apply, and the tax may be assessed at any time.

If a person files an amended state income tax return, or other information as required by the tax commissioner, pursuant to section 57-38-34.4, the tax commissioner has two years after the amended state income tax return, or other information as required by the tax commissioner, is filed to audit the state income tax return and assess any additional state income tax attributable to the changes or corrections made by the United States internal revenue service, or other competent authority, or that is attributable to the amended federal income tax return, even though other time periods prescribed in this section for the assessment of tax may have expired. The provisions of this subsection do not limit or restrict any other time period prescribed in this section for the assessment of tax that has not expired as of the end of the two-year period prescribed in this subsection.

For taxable years beginning before January 1, 1991, any person who consents to an extension of time for the assessment of taxes with the internal revenue service shall be presumed to have consented to a similar extension of time for the assessment or refund of state income tax with the state tax commissioner. Refunds under this subdivision are limited to tax years beginning after July 1, 1983.

If a determination is made under subdivision a that additional tax is due and the tax commissioner has previously refunded income taxes related to the amended return or claim, subsection 2 of section 57-38-45 does not apply to the refunded amount.

If a person fails to file an amended state income tax return, or other information as required by the tax commissioner, under section 57-38-34.4, the tax commissioner may assess any additional tax found due which is attributable to the changes or corrections made by the United States internal revenue service, or other competent authority, or which is attributable to the amended federal income tax return, at any time, even though other time periods prescribed in this section may have expired.

If before the expiration of the time periods prescribed in subsections 1, 2, and 3 the tax commissioner and a person consent in writing to an extension of time for the assessment of the tax, an assessment of additional state income tax may be made at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon. If a person refuses to consent to an extension of time or a renewal thereof, the tax commissioner may make an assessment based on the best information available. The period agreed upon in this subsection, including extensions, expires upon issuance of an assessment by the tax commissioner.

Except for an amended return required to be filed under section 57-38-34.4, if a person files an amended state income tax return within the time periods prescribed in subsections 1, 2, and 3 of this section or subsections 1 and 2 of section 57-38-40, the tax commissioner has two years after the amended state income tax return is filed to audit the state income tax return and assess any additional state income tax attributable to the changes or corrections on the amended return, even though other time periods prescribed in this section for the assessment of tax may have expired. The provisions of this subsection do not limit or restrict any other time period prescribed in this section for the assessment of tax that has not expired at the end of the two-year period prescribed in this subsection.

For investments made under chapters 57-38.5 and 57-38.6 after December 31, 2002, the tax commissioner has four years after the due date of the return, or four years after the return was filed, whichever period expires later, to audit any seed capital investment tax credit or agricultural business investment tax credit claimed by a taxpayer and assess the tax if additional tax is found due. The provisions of this subsection do not limit or restrict any other time period prescribed in this section for the assessment of tax.

This section applies if additional tax would be due under the provisions of chapter 57-35.3 in effect for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2013.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 35; 1925 Supp., § 2346a34; S.L. 1929, ch. 240, § 1; 1931, ch. 284, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-3838; S.L. 1945, ch. 307, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-3838; S.L. 1961, ch. 362, § 1; 1967, ch. 455, § 1; 1971, ch. 561, § 1; 1973, ch. 474, § 1; 1983, ch. 638, § 1; 1985, ch. 630, § 7; 1987, ch. 694, § 3; 1991, ch. 648, § 5; 1997, ch. 493, § 2; 2001, ch. 529, § 2; 2003, ch. 532, § 1; 2005, ch. 566, § 2; 2007, ch. 524, § 1; 2013, ch. 449, § 14.

57-38-39.
Deficiency, protest, and appeal.

When tax is understated on a return because of a mathematical or clerical error, the tax commissioner shall notify the person of the nature of the error and the amount of additional tax due. This notice is not a notice of deficiency and the person has no right to protest.

If upon audit the tax commissioner finds additional tax due, the tax commissioner shall notify the person of the deficiency in the tax payment. Such notice of deficiency must be sent first-class mail and must assess the amount of additional tax due and set forth the reasons for the increase.

A person has thirty days, ninety days if the person is outside the United States, to file a written protest objecting to the tax commissioner’s assessment of additional tax due. The protest must set forth the basis for the protest and any other information which may be required by the tax commissioner. If a person fails to file a written protest within the time provided, the amount of additional tax assessed in the notice of deficiency becomes finally and irrevocably fixed. If a person protests only a portion of the tax commissioner’s finding, the portion which is not protested becomes finally and irrevocably fixed.

If a protest is filed, the tax commissioner shall reconsider the assessment of additional tax due. The reconsideration may include further examination by the tax commissioner or the tax commissioner’s representative of a person’s books, papers, records, or memoranda. The tax commissioner, upon request, may grant the person an informal conference.

Within a reasonable time after the protest, the tax commissioner shall mail to the taxpayer a notice of reconsideration and assessment which must respond to the person’s protest and assess the amount of additional tax due. The amount set forth in that notice becomes finally and irrevocably fixed unless the person within thirty days commences formal administrative review as provided for in chapter 28-32 by the filing of a complaint.

Upon written request, the tax commissioner may grant an extension of time to file a protest as provided for in subsection 3 or an extension of time to commence formal review as provided in subsection 5.

In all cases in which the tax commissioner finds that a person has an obligation to file an income tax return in North Dakota and has failed to do so, the tax commissioner shall notify the person by first-class mail of the tax commissioner’s finding and of the remedies provided for in sections 57-38-33, 57-38-45, and 57-38-47. The remedies provided for in the above-listed sections are mutually exclusive and if a person fails to file an income tax return after being notified, the tax commissioner may elect a remedy under which to proceed. If the tax commissioner elects to take the action provided for in section 57-38-33 or subsection 6 of section 57-38-45, the amount so assessed is not reviewable.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 312, § 35; 1925 Supp., § 2346a34; S.L. 1929, ch. 240, § 1; 1931, ch. 284, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-3839; S.L. 1969, ch. 514, § 2; 1983, ch. 638, § 2.